Washington statutes.
RCW 14.07.040

Acts ratified and confirmed—Chapter cumulative.

All acts of any such municipality in the exercise or attempted exercise of any powers herein conferred are hereby ratified and confirmed. The provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative and nothing herein contained shall abridge or limit the powers of the city, town, port district or county under existing law.

[ 1941 c 21 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2722-11. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 3 s 1; 1929 c 93 s 1; 1919 c 48 s 1.]